Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.020

Supervisor of industrial insurance—Appointment—Authority—Personnel.

The director of labor and industries shall appoint and deputize an assistant, to be known as the supervisor of industrial insurance, who shall have authority to perform those duties delegated by the director and by statute.

The director may appoint and employ such adjusters, medical and other examiners, auditors, inspectors, clerks, and other assistants as may be necessary to the administration of workers' compensation and medical aid in this state.

[ 1994 c 164 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.22.020. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 75; RRS s 10833.]

NOTES:

Industrial insurance: Title 51 RCW.